Hawaii statutes.
[§663-1.2] Tort liability for breach of
contract; punitive damages. No person may recover damages, including
punitive damages, in tort for a breach of a contract in the absence of conduct
that:

(1) Violated a duty that is independently recognized
by principles of tort law; and

(2) Transcended the breach of the contract. [L 1999,
c 237, §1]

Law Journals and Reviews

Russ Francis v. Lee Enterprises: Hawai‘i Turns Away From
Tortious Breach of Contract. 23 UH L. Rev. 647 (2001).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next